New York, session 2025-2026, S9662.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 2500-n to read as follows: 3 § 2500-n. Placenta accreta spectrum screenings. 1. For purposes of 4 this section "placenta accreta spectrum" means a pregnancy complication 5 that occurs when the placenta attaches too deeply into the wall of the 6 uterus. 7 2. The commissioner, in consultation with other relevant stakeholders 8 as determined by the commissioner, shall publish guidance for incorpo- 9 rating placenta accreta spectrum screenings into routine prenatal care. 10 This guidance shall include, but not be limited to, recommendations and 11 best practices related to: 12 (a) when a physician or other authorized practitioner attending a 13 pregnant person should initiate placenta accreta spectrum screenings and 14 how often such screenings should be repeated throughout pregnancy; 15 (b) screening for risk factors that may contribute to placenta accreta 16 spectrum such as multiple cesarean sections, placenta previa, advanced 17 maternal age, multiparity and prior uterine surgeries or curettage; and 18 (c) referrals for appropriate follow-up evaluation, diagnosis, and 19 treatment. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 21 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14949-03-6